District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.02

Time periods.

If a time period running under this chapter ends on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, it is extended until the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 502, 27 DCR 2975

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1652.

Editor's Notes

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.